Illinois, session 104th, HB3748.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-627 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-627 new)8    Sec. 2705-627. Homeless camps. If property other than a 9roadway that is owned by the Department has been used as an 10encampment site for 30 days or more for people who are 11experiencing homelessness, the property shall be transferred 12within 30 days to the Department of Natural Resources and 13treated as a campground under the Campground Licensing and 14Recreational Area Act, including charging those experiencing 15homelessness all applicable camping fees.